District of Columbia statutes.
34-1255.05

Transfer or purchase of franchise after denial of renewal.

Except if there is a pending appeal, or the decision is stayed by a judicial or administrative review, upon a decision by the Council to deny a renewal, the Council may, on the expiration date of the franchise, either authorize the District to purchase the assets of the cable operator’s cable system at a price not to exceed fair market value with no value allocated to the franchise itself, or the Council may select another person, after a public hearing, and cause that person to purchase the assets at a price not to exceed fair market value.

History

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 505
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-1255.07.